src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON CLASS-AA !!= @CODE@
+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE:%> # ;
+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT:%>ga # ;
+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT:%> # ;
+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT:%>gáng # ;
+V+DIRECT+PAST:%>gán # ;
+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST:%>gáa # ;
+V+INDIRECT+PAST:%>gáan # ;
+V+RELATIVE:%>s # ;
+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL:%>gáas # ;
+V+NON_FACTIVE:%>%.áng # ;
+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE:%>gáa%.ang # ;
+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL:%>gáng # ;
+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL:%>gánggang # ;
+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE:%>gangáng # ;
+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL:%>gíinii # ;
+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL:%>gáangaa # ;
+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL:%>gáangaan # ;
+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG:%>äsáa # ;
+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT:%>äs # ;
+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE:%>äsáang # ;
+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE:%>äsga # ;
+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE:%>äsáas # ;
+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE:%>äsáa%.ang # ;
+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE:%>%.áng% %^WSk̲asa'áa # ;
+V+NEAR+FUTURE:%>%.áng% %^WSk̲asa'áang # ;
+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE:%>%.áng% %^WSk̲asaasdláa # ;
+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE:%>%.áng% %^WSk̲asaasdláang # ;
+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT:%>'úuj # ;
+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT:%>'úujang # ;
+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION:%>äsáa'uujang # ;
+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT:%>'us # ;
+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST:%>'ujáa # ;
+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL:%>'úujaangaa # ;
+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE:%>äsáa'us # ;
+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT:%>'ahlánggang # ;
+V+CERTAIN+PAST:%>'ahlánggan # ;
+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL:%>'ahlánggíinii # ;
+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE:%>äsáa'ahlans # ;
+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE:%>'ahláns # ;
+V+INTENSIVE+PAST:%>gáa'ahlang # ;
+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE:%>gáa'ahlanggaa # ;
+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT:%>gáa'ahlanggang # ;
+V+REFLEXIVE:%>'ahl # ;
+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE:%>äséehl # ;
+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE:%>'úu # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT:%>'wáa # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT:%>'wáa # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT:%>'wáang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST:%>'wägán # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST:%>'áawaa # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST:%>'áawaan # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE:%>'wáas # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL:%>'áawaas # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE:%>'wáa%.ang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE:%>'áawaa%.ang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL:%>gáng'waa # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL:%>gáng'waang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE:%>gáng'waa%.ang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL:%>'wägíinii # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL:%>'wägáangaa # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL:%>'wägáangaan # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG:%>'wáaäsaa # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT:%>'wáaäs # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE:%>'wáaäsaang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE:%>'wáaäsga # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE:%>'wáaäsaas # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE:%>'wáaäsaa%.ang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE:%>'wáa%.áng% %^WSk̲asa'áa # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE:%>'wáa%.áng% %^WSk̲asa'áang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE:%>'wáa%.áng% %^WSk̲asaasdláa # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE:%>'wáa%.áng% %^WSk̲asaasdláang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT:%>'wáa'uuj # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT:%>'wáa'uujang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION:%>'wáaäsaa'uujang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT:%>'wáa'us # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST:%>'wáa'ujaa # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL:%>'wáa'uujaangaa # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE:%>'wáaäsaa'us # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT:%>'wáa'ahlanggang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST:%>'wáa'ahlanggan # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL:%>'wáa'ahlanggíinii # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE:%>'wáaäsaa'ahlans # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE:%>'wáa'ahlans # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST:%>'áawaa'ahlang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE:%>'áawaa'ahlanggaa # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT:%>'áawaa'ahlanggang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE:%>'wáa'ahl # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE:%>'wáaäseehl # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE:%>'áng # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT:%>'ángga # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT:%>'áng # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT:%>'ánggang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST:%>'ánggan # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST:%>'áangaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST:%>'áangaan # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE:%>'áns # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL:%>'áangaas # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE:%>'angáng # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE:%>'áangaa%.ang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL:%>'ánggang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL:%>gáng'anggang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE:%>gáng'angang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL:%>'ánggíinii # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL:%>'ánggaangaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL:%>'ánggaangaan # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG:%>'ángäsaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT:%>'ángäs # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE:%>'ángäsaang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE:%>'ángäsga # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE:%>'ángäsaas # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE:%>'ángäsaa%.ang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE:%>%.áng% %^WSk̲asaa'áng # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE:%>%.áng% %^WSk̲asaa'ánggang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE:%>%.áng% %^WSk̲asaasdlä'áng # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE:%>%.áng% %^WSk̲asaasdlä'ánggang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT:%>'áng'uuj # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT:%>'áng'uujang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION:%>'ángäsaa'uujang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT:%>'áng'us # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST:%>'áng'ujaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL:%>'áng'uujaangaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE:%>'ángäsaa'us # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT:%>'áang'ahlanggang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST:%>'áang'ahlanggan # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL:%>'áang'ahlanggíinii # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE:%>'ángäsaa'ahlans # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE:%>'áang'ahlans # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST:%>'áangaa'ahlang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE:%>'áangaa'ahlanggaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT:%>'áangaa'ahlanggang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE:%>'áang'ahl # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE:%>'ángäseehl # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE:%>'áng'uu # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT:%>'áng'waa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT:%>'áng'waa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT:%>'áng'waang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST:%>'áng'wägan # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST:%>'áng'aawaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST:%>'áng'aawaan # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE:%>'áng'waas # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL:%>'áng'aawaas # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE:%>'áng'waa%.ang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE:%>'áng'aawaa%.ang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL:%>gáng'ang'waa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL:%>gáng'ang'waang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE:%>gáng'ang'waa%.ang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL:%>'áng'wägíinii # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL:%>'áng'wägáangaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL:%>'áng'wägáangaan # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG:%>'áng'waaäsaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT:%>'áng'waaäs # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE:%>'áng'waaäsaang # ;
