src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs !!= @CODE@
da% g̲áydangaa CLASS-AA "for S to be able to be pushed around fast [said of something on wheels, such as a table or cart]" ;
dáng% gadayáa CLASS-AA "for S to have been plucked, pulled [said of eyebrows and whiskers only]" ;
gab'adáa CLASS-AA "for S (sg) to have penetrated (in direction) [said of a 1-D object]" ;
gíilaa CLASS-AA "for there to be deep pool(s) or river hole(s) in location" ;
gúngahldayaa CLASS-AA "for S to have had its valves removed [said of a chiton]" ;
g̲a% cha'áangwaa CLASS-AA "for S to have cushion(s) on it" ;
g̲a% káldiisgayaa CLASS-AA "for S (pl) <kál> to come apart at point, line or plane of weakness, to split apart" ;
g̲a% tl'abdajáa CLASS-AA "for S <tl'ab> to come apart at point, line or plane of weakness, to split apart" ;
g̲awáa CLASS-AA "for S to have fur or body hair on it" ;
g̲i% k'aayst'ayáa CLASS-AA "for S to have been stretched out by being worn" ;
híiluu% xabusdayáa CLASS-AA "for S to have gotten finished fast, have gotten used up fast, have gone by fast [said of food, day, week, month (but not hour)]" ;
hlkáak'aa CLASS-AA "for S to be riddled with holes [said of something loosely woven, roof, bread with air pockets, etc, not of ragged cloth objects]" ;
INS% chiisälangáa CLASS-AA "for S (sg) {cha} to be made or fixed so as to to wave, swing or rock back and forth by INS" ;
INS% g̲áast'ayaa CLASS-AA "for S to have been washed out by current or wave action" ;
INS% hlk̲'wáahldiisgayaa CLASS-AA "for S (pl) <hlk̲'wáahl> to have been split by <INS>, to have been made to come apart by <INS>" ;
INS% k̲'íidiisgayaa CLASS-AA "for S (pl) <k̲'íi> to have been split by <INS>, to have been made to come apart by <INS>" ;
INS% skáa%.aysälangaa CLASS-AA "for S (sg) {skáa} to be made or fixed so as to to wave, swing or rock back and forth by INS" ;
INS% tíingandayee%.elaa CLASS-AA "for S to have been made into a {tíi} shape, to have been made to be {tíi} shaped" ;
isdaláa CLASS-AA "for S (pl) to have been born after X" ;
jáam% táawaa CLASS-AA "for S to be some kind of jam jar or jam dish" ;
kámbasgaa CLASS-AA "for S to be (some kind of) a compass" ;
kíl% ánts'ayaa CLASS-AA "for S to have been killed or murdered by being verbally picked on" ;
kúnadiiyaa CLASS-AA "for S (pl) to not be level, to slant down [said of a floor, table, board, rope, etc.]" ;
kyúu% hlgiyangáa CLASS-AA "for S (sg) {hlgi} to have been tied so that it hangs down" ;
k̲agán% ináa CLASS-AA "for S to have a lump in their throat, feel like crying (over X)" ;
k̲'áalandayaa CLASS-AA "for S to have been willed to X" ;
k̲ehjgadáa CLASS-AA "for S to be paid attention to out of respect" ;
k̲íihlgaa% da%.áawaa CLASS-AA "1. for S to have a cupboard [said of a home] 2. for S to be some kind of standing cupboard or china cabinet" ;
k̲íiyä% hlk̲'wáahlidaa CLASS-AA "for S (sg) {hlk̲'wáahl} to have been found" ;
k̲íiyä% tl'ahidáa CLASS-AA "for S (sg) {tl'ah} to have been found" ;
k̲ungáa CLASS-AA "for S to be the moon" ;
mánggiigaa CLASS-AA "for S to be naughty (applied to children only)" ;
sasä% lahjuwáa CLASS-AA "for S (sg) to be built of stacked, notched logs" ;
sdluunangáa CLASS-AA "for S to be red and sore [said of eyes]" ;
sgwaalangáa CLASS-AA "for S to have had splinters and junk burned from its bottom with a pitchwood brand [said of a canoe]" ;
síigaa CLASS-AA "for S to have a stetch of sea [said of a place]" ;
sk̲'ad% dlasdluuyáa CLASS-AA "for S to be unpredictable" ;
stlaahlgayáa CLASS-AA "for S to have had holes poked in it by someone's finger" ;
t'aadiisdliyáa CLASS-AA "for S (pl) {t'a} to have been hung up" ;
tíilaa CLASS-AA "for S to come up to the hips (said of boots)" ;
tl'aagáa CLASS-AA "for S to be tired, weary [said of people and higher animals]" ;
tláayaadaa CLASS-AA "for S to have gotten too much of X to handle it all [said of salmon]" ;
ts'angáa CLASS-AA "for S to have teeth" ;
xasdlatl'aayáa CLASS-AA "for S to have started to try their best" ;
xwáasdägaa CLASS-AA "for S to be canvas, to be denim" ;
x̲áng% k'uluyáa CLASS-AA "for S to look real, look expensive" ;
